Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.100

Appeal from secretary's order.

If the secretary issues an order that any person is not entitled to an aircraft dealer's license or that an existing license should be suspended or revoked, he or she shall forthwith notify the applicant or dealer in writing. The applicant has thirty days from the date of the secretary's order to appeal therefrom to the superior court of Thurston county, which he or she may do by filing a notice of the appeal with the clerk of the superior court and at the same time filing a copy of the notice with the secretary.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6001; 1984 c 7 s 17; 1955 c 150 s 10.]